Mississippi, session 2026, HB1719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created a study committee for the purpose of studying prevention strategies on financial fraud and other related scams, improve investor education, and for the purpose of recommending solutions.  The committee shall be comprised of the following eleven (11) members: (a)  One (1) member of the Senate, or the member's designee, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (b)  One (1) member of the House of Representatives, or the member's designee, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (c)  The Secretary of State, or a designee; (d)  The Attorney General, or a designee; (e)  The Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, or a designee; (f)  The Executive Director of the Department of Human Services, or a designee; (g)  The Commissioner of the Insurance Department, or a designee; (h)  The Superintendent of Education, or a designee; (i)  The Executive Director of the Veteran's Affairs Office, or a designee; (j)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or a designee; and (k)  The State Auditor, or a designee. (2)  Appointments to the study committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act.  At the first meeting, the committee shall elect from among its membership a chairman, a vice chairman and any other officers determined to be necessary, and shall adopt rules for transacting business and keeping records. (3)  A majority of the members of the study committee shall constitute a quorum.  In the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, and in the election of a chairman, vice chairman and any other officers determined to be necessary, an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be required. (4)  The Secretary of State shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the study committee to perform its duties. (5)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political, subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chairman of the study committee, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the study committee to carry out its duties. (6)  The study committee shall be dissolved on or before January 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.